North Dakota, session 69, SB2051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 43-30-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
43-30-16. Examination, license, and registration fees.
The board may establish by rule and charge the following fees:
1. The fee to be paid by an applicant for an examination to determine the applicant's fitness to
receive a license as a private investigator or a license to provide private security services may
not exceed one hundred is one hundred fifty dollars.
2. The fee to be paid by an applicant for the initial issuance or the renewal of a license as a
private investigator or a license to provide private security services may not exceed
one hundred fifty is two hundred twenty - five dollars. A late fee not to exceed fifty of seventy - five
dollars may be charged for each month the renewal fee is due and unpaid.
3. The fee to be paid by an applicant to apply for a license to conduct a private security or
detective agency may not exceed one hundred is one hundred fifty dollars.
4. The fee for the issuance or the renewal of a license to conduct a private security or detective
agency may not exceed three hundred is four hundred fifty dollars. A late fee not to exceed
one hundred of o ne hundred fifty dollars may be charged for each month the renewal fee is
due and unpaid.
5. The one-timeinitial fee to be paid by an applicant for the issuance of a private security training
certificate may not exceed twenty-fiveis forty dollars. The fee for the renewal of a private
security training certificate is forty dollars. A late fee of fifteen dollars may be charged for each
month the renewal fee is due and unpaid.
6. The annual fee to be paid by an applicant for the issuance of an armed certificate may not
exceed thirty is forty - five dollars. A late fee not to exceed ten of fifteen dollars may be charged
for each month the renewal fee is due and unpaid.
7. The fee to be paid for the issuance of a duplicate license may not exceed twenty is thirty
dollars.
8. The initial registration fee to provide private investigative service or private security service
may not exceed thirty is forty - five dollars. The fee for the renewal of a registration to provide
private investigative service or private security service may not exceed thirty is forty - five
dollars. A late fee not to exceed ten of fifteen dollars may be charged for each month the
renewal fee is due and unpaid.

S. B. NO. 2051 - PAGE 2
9. The initial application fee for a certified course instructor for an armed first responder training
certification may not exceed four hundred is six hundred dollars. A fee for renewal of a course
instructor certification for an armed first responder program may not exceed three hundredis
four hundred fifty dollars.
SECTION 2. PERFORMANCE AUDIT - NORTH DAKOTA PRIVATE INVESTIGATIVE AND
SECURITY BOARD. The state auditor shall conduct a performance audit of the North Dakota private
investigative and security board, in accordance with chapter 54-10, during the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The performance audit must be in addition to the requirements
under section 54-10-27.
SECTION 3. EMERGENCY. Section 1 of this Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2051 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2051 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 85 Nays 5 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State